Utah statutes.
65A-14-301.   Economic benefits of bioprospecting denied.
(1)  A person who engages in an act of bioprospecting in violation of this
chapter is guilty of criminal trespass punishable in accordance with Section
76-6-206.
(2)  If found guilty of a violation under this chapter, a court may in
addition to a penalty imposed under Section 76-6-206, order restitution that
is proportional to the economic interests the state may have under Section
65A-14-202.
